Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 16

Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services

4-3-1601. Creation — General functions.

There is created the department of mental health and substance abuse services.

The general functions of the department are to coordinate, set standards for, plan for, monitor, and promote the development and provision of services and supports to meet the needs of persons with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance through the public and private sectors in this state as set out in applicable provisions of title 33.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 9; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The department of mental health and substance abuse services, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

Former part 16, §§4-3-1601 —4-3-1603 (Acts 1953, ch. 27, §§ 1, 2 (Williams, §§ 255.68e, 266.68f); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 52, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1965, ch. 82, §§ 8, 16; Acts 1971, ch. 411, § 1; 1974, ch. 802, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; modified; 1978, ch. 617, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 4-321, 4-322; Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 10; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 2-6), concerning the department of mental health and developmental disabilities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 9 and 10, effective January 15, 2011.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Transfer to the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, §4-3-2705.

4-3-1602. Commissioner.

The department of mental health and substance abuse services shall be in the charge of a commissioner, who shall be appointed by the governor in the same manner as are other commissioners and who shall have the same official status as other commissioners.

The commissioner shall hold office at the pleasure of the governor, and the commissioner's compensation shall be fixed by the governor and paid from the appropriation available to such department.

The commissioner shall be appointed without regard to residence on the basis of merit as measured by administrative abilities and a demonstrated quality of leadership, and must have a recognized graduate degree as a psychiatrist, doctor of medicine, behavioral scientist, social scientist, educator or other profession involved with human development, human welfare or human relations, with experience in public administration; and shall further have a professional background in the area of mental illness or serious emotional disturbance, and an understanding of the conditions of mental health, human development, human welfare and social services.

No person shall be eligible to appointment as commissioner unless such person is at least thirty (30) years of age and has five (5) years of administrative experience, including at least three (3) years of full-time management experience in private enterprise, private practice or public service.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 9; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 16, §§4-3-1601 —4-3-1603 (Acts 1953, ch. 27, §§ 1, 2 (Williams, §§ 255.68e, 266.68f); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 52, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1965, ch. 82, §§ 8, 16; Acts 1971, ch. 411, § 1; 1974, ch. 802, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; modified; 1978, ch. 617, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 4-321, 4-322; Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 10; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 2-6), concerning the department of mental health and developmental disabilities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 9 and 10, effective January 15, 2011.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

4-3-1603. Powers and duties.

The department of mental health and substance abuse services has jurisdiction and control over the mental health facilities of the state, regardless of the names by which the facilities are known.

The department, through its appropriate officials, has the duty and power to provide the best possible care for persons with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance in the state by improving existing facilities, by developing future facilities and programs, and by adopting a preventive program for mental illness and serious emotional disturbance, all as provided in applicable provisions of title 33.

The department of mental health and substance abuse services shall administer title 33, chapter 2, part 4.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 9; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 16, §§4-3-1601 —4-3-1603 (Acts 1953, ch. 27, §§ 1, 2 (Williams, §§ 255.68e, 266.68f); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 52, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1965, ch. 82, §§ 8, 16; Acts 1971, ch. 411, § 1; 1974, ch. 802, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; modified; 1978, ch. 617, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 4-321, 4-322; Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 10; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 2-6), concerning the department of mental health and developmental disabilities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 9 and 10, effective January 15, 2011.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.